de: Audiotechnologie: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; DTS-HD-Master-Audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby-Atmos; Dolby Digital (AC-3); Dolby TrueHD; LPCM (Lineare Pulsecodemodulation); PCM (Pulscodemodulation); Sonstiges
bg-BG: Аудиотехнология: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; Звук с висока разделителна способност DTS-HD; DTS-HD master audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (линейна импулсна кодова модулация); PCM (импулсна кодова модулация); Други
hu: Hangtechnológia: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; DTS-HD Master Audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby Atmos; Dolby Digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (lineáris impulzuskód-moduláció); PCM (impulzuskód-moduláció); Egyéb
pl: Technologia audio: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; Dźwięk wysokiej rozdzielczości DTS-HD; DTS-HD master audio; DTS-X; Dolby digital plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (liniowa modulacja kodu impulsowego); PCM (modulacja impulsowo-kodowa); Pozostałe
pt-BR: Tecnologia de áudio: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; Áudio de alta resolução DTS-HD; DTS-HD master audio; DTS-X; Dolby digital plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby True HD; LPCM (modulação de código de pulso linear); PCM (Pulse Code Modulation); Outro
cs: Audiotechnologie: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; DTS-HD master audio; DTS-X; Dolby digital plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (Linear Pulse Code Modulation); PCM (Pulse Code Modulation); Jiné
ru: Аудиотехнология: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; DTS-HD Master Audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby Atmos; Dolby Digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (линейная импульсно-кодовая модуляция); PCM (импульсно-кодовая модуляция); Другое
el: Τεχνολογία ήχου: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; DTS-HD Master Audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (γραμμική παλμοκωδική διαμόρφωση); PCM (παλμοκωδική διαμόρφωση); Άλλο
sk-SK: Audio technológia: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; Zvuk vo vysokom rozlíšení DTS-HD; Hlavný zvuk DTS-HD; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby Digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (modulácia lineárneho pulzného kódu); PCM (modulácia pulzného kódu); Iné
sv: Ljudteknik: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; DTS-HD master audio; DTS-X; Dolby digital plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (Linear Pulse Code Modulation); PCM (Puls Code Modulation); Annat
en: Audio technology: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; DTS-HD master audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (Linear Pulse Code Modulation); PCM (Pulse Code Modulation); Other
pt-PT: Tecnologia de áudio: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; Áudio de alta resolução DTS-HD; DTS-HD Master Audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby Atmos; Dolby Digital (AC-3); Dolby TrueHD; LPCM (Modulação por código de pulso linear); Modulação por código de pulso (PCM); Outro
ko: 오디오 기술: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD 고해상도 오디오; DTS-HD 마스터 오디오; DTS-X; 돌비 디지털 플러스(E-AC-3); 돌비 Pro Logic IIz; 돌비 애트모스; 돌비 디지털(AC-3); 돌비 트루HD; LPCM(리니어 펄스 부호 변조); PCM(펄스 부호 변조); 기타
sl-SI: Zvočna tehnologija: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD zvok visoke ločljivosti; Glavni zvočni zapis DTS-HD; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (linearna pulzno kodna modulacija); PCM (pulzno kodna modulacija); Druga
zh-CN: 音频技术: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS 虚拟; DTS-HD 高分辨率音频; DTS-HD 主体音频; DTS-X; 杜比数字增强版 (E-AC-3); 杜比专业逻辑 IIz; 杜比全景声; 杜比数字 (AC-3); 杜比 trueHD; LPCM（线性脉冲编码调制）; PCM（脉冲编码调制）; 其他
ja: オーディオテクノロジー: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; DTS-HDマスターオーディオ; DTS-X; ドルビーデジタルプラス (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; ドルビーアトモス; ドルビーデジタル (AC-3); ドルビーTrueHD; LPCM (リニアパルス符号変調); PCM (パルス符号変調); その他
hr-HR: Audio tehnologija: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD zvuk visoke rezolucije; DTS-HD Master Audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby Atmos; Dolby Digital (AC-3); Dolby TrueHD; LPCM (linearna pulsno-kodna modulacija); PCM (pulsno-kodna modulacija); Ostalo
es: Tecnología de audio: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; Audio de alta resolución DTS-HD; Audio de alta definición DTS Master; DTS-X; Dolby digital plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby Atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (modulación lineal por impulsos codificados); PCM (Modulación de Código de Pulso); Otros
lt-LT: Garso technologija: AAC; DTS; „DTS Neo“; „DTS Virtual“; „DTS-HD High Resolution Audio“; „DTS-HD High Resolution Audio“; DTS-X; „Dolby Digital Plus“ (E-AC-3); „Dolby Pro Logic IIz“; „Dolby Atmos“; „Dolby Digital“ (AC-3); „Dolby trueHD“; LPCM (tiesinis kodinis impulsinis moduliavimas); PCM (kodinis impulsinis moduliavimas); Kita
it: Tecnologia audio: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS virtuale; Audio DTS-HD ad alta risoluzione; DTS-HD master audio; DTS-X; Dolby digital plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (modulazione a impulsi codificati lineare); PCM (modulazione del codice a impulsi); Altro
nl: Audiotechnologie: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD-audio met hoge resolutie; DTS-HD-masteraudio; DTS-X; Dolby digitaal plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby-atmosfeer; Dolby digitaal (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (lineaire pulscodemodulatie); PCM (pulscodemodulatie); Andere
ro-RO: Tehnologie audio: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; DTS-HD master audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (Linear Pulse Code Modulation); PCM (Pulse Code Modulation); Altele
th: เทคโนโลยีเสียง: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD รองรับเสียงความละเอียดสูง; DTS-HD Master Audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby Atmos; Dolby Digital (AC-3); Dolby TrueHD; LPCM (สวิตช์แบบ Linear การกล้ำรหัสของพัลส์); PCM (การกล้ำรหัสของพัลส์); อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 音訊技術: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; 數位劇院大師級音訊系統; 杜比全景聲天空聲道; 杜比數位升級版 (E-AC-3); 杜比定向邏輯IIz; 杜比全景聲; 杜比數位 (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (線性脈衝編碼調製); PCM (脈衝編碼調變); 其他
vi: Công nghệ âm thanh: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; Âm thanh độ phân giải cao DTS-HD; DTS-HD master audio; DTS-X; Dolby kỹ thuật số cộng (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Công nghệ âm thanh vòm Dolby; Dolby kỹ thuật số (AC-3); Dolby TrueHD; LPCM (Điều chế mã xung tuyến tính); PCM (Điều chế mã xung); Khác
da: Lydteknologi: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD lyd i høj opløsning; DTS-HD master audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby Atmos; Dolby Digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (Linear Pulse Code Modulation); PCM (Pulse Code Modulation); Andet
tr: Ses Teknolojisi: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD Yüksek Çözünürlüklü Ses; DTS-HD master audio; DTS-X; Dolby digital plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (Doğrusal Darbe Kodu Modülasyonu); PCM (Darbe Kodu Modülasyonu); Diğer
fr: Technologie audio: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; Audio haute résolution DTS-HD; Audio maître DTS-HD; DTS-X; Dolby numérique plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby numérique (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (modulation par impulsion codée linéaire); PCM (modulation par code d’impulsion); Autre
fi: Audioteknologia: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; DTS-HD Master Audio; DTS-X; Dolby Digital Plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby Atmos; Dolby Digital (AC-3); Dolby TrueHD; LPCM (lineaarinen pulssikoodimodulaatio); PCM (Pulse Code Modulation); Muu
nb: Lydteknologi: AAC; DTS; DTS Neo; DTS Virtual; DTS-HD High Resolution Audio; DTS-HD masterlyd; DTS-X; Dolby digital plus (E-AC-3); Dolby Pro Logic IIz; Dolby atmos; Dolby digital (AC-3); Dolby trueHD; LPCM (Linear Pulse Code Modulation); PCM (Pulse Code Modulation); Annen